District of Columbia statutes.
22-1502

Forging or imitating brands or packaging of goods.

Whoever wilfully forges, or counterfeits, or makes use of any imitation calculated to deceive the public, though with colorable difference or deviation therefrom, of the private brand, wrapper, label, trademark, bottle, or package usually affixed or used by any person to or with the goods, wares, merchandise, preparation, or mixture of such person, with intent to pass off any work, goods, manufacture, compound, preparation, or mixture as the manufacture or production of such person which is not really such, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1333, ch. 854, § 879
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(e), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(v), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Fraud, see § 22-3221.
Violations pertaining to registration of containers of milk and beverages composed principally of milk, see §§ 36-130 and 36-153.
Violations pertaining to registration of labor union labels, see § 36-203.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1402.
1973 Ed., § 22-1402.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(e) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(v) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.